Nebraska, session 109, LB660.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Sections 1 to 19 of this act shall be known and may be cited
as the State Building Construction Alternatives Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the State Building Construction Alternatives Act:
(1) Alternative technical concept means changes suggested by a qualified,
eligible, short-listed design-builder to the basic configurations, project
scope, design, or construction criteria of the authorized agency;
(2) Authorized agency means the Department of Correctional Services, the
Department of Transportation, the Military Department, or the state building
division;
(3) Best value-based selection process means a process of selecting a
design-builder using price, schedule, and qualifications for evaluation
factors;
(4) Construction manager means the legal entity which proposes to enter
into a construction manager-general contractor contract pursuant to the State
Building Construction Alternatives Act;
(5) Construction manager-general contractor contract means a contract
which is subject to a qualification-based selection process between an
authorized agency and a construction manager to furnish preconstruction
services during the design development phase of the project and, if an
agreement can be reached which is satisfactory to the authorized agency,
construction services for the construction phase of the project;
(6) Construction services means activities associated with building the
project;
(7) Design-build contract means a contract between an authorized agency
and a design-builder which is subject to a best value-based selection process
to furnish (a) architectural, engineering, and related design services and (b)
labor, materials, supplies, equipment, and construction services;
(8) Design-builder means the legal entity which proposes to enter into a
design-build contract;
(9) Preconstruction services means all nonconstruction-related services
that a construction manager performs in relation to the design of the project
before execution of a contract for construction services. Preconstruction
services includes, but is not limited to, cost estimating, value management
studies, constructability reviews, delivery schedule assessments, and support
of life-cycle analysis;
(10) Project performance criteria means the performance requirements of
the project suitable to allow the design-builder to make a proposal.
Performance requirements shall include, but are not limited to, the following,
if required by the project: Capacity, durability, standards, ingress and egress
requirements, description of the site, surveys, soil and environmental
information concerning the site, material quality standards, design and
milestone dates, site development requirements, compliance with applicable law,
and other criteria for the intended use of the project;
(11) Proposal means an offer in response to a request for proposals (a) by
a design-builder to enter into a design-build contract or (b) by a construction
manager to enter into a construction manager-general contractor contract;
(12) Qualification-based selection process means a process of selecting a
construction manager based on qualifications;
(13) Request for proposals means the documentation by which an authorized
agency solicits proposals; and
(14) Request for qualifications means the documentation or publication by
which an authorized agency solicits qualifications.
Sec. 3. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this
section, the purpose of the State Building Construction Alternatives Act is to
provide each authorized agency with alternative methods of contracting for
state buildings for which the authorized agency has responsibility.
(2) The alternative methods of contracting shall be available to each
authorized agency for use on any project regardless of the funding source. An
-1-

LB660 LB660
2025 2025
authorized agency may enter into a construction manager-general contractor
contract only if the total cost of the project is more than thirty million
dollars. The State Building Construction Alternatives Act shall govern the
design-build and construction manager-general contractor procurement processes
for authorized agencies.
(3) The State Building Construction Alternatives Act does not apply to
projects to which the Public Water and Natural Resources Project Contracting
Act, the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act, or the Transportation
Innovation Act apply. The State Building Construction Alternatives Act does not
apply to the University of Nebraska or the state colleges.
Sec. 4. (1) An authorized agency, in accordance with the State Building
Construction Alternatives Act, may solicit and execute a design-build contract
or a construction manager-general contractor contract for state buildings for
which the authorized agency has responsibility except as otherwise provided in
section 3 of this act.
(2) Before executing a design-build contract or construction manager-
general contractor contract, an authorized agency shall submit a request for
approval from the Director of Administrative Services or his or her designee.
The request shall include the following:
(a) A written determination that, due to the nature, detail, or
circumstances of a project, the use of a design-build contract or construction
manager-general contractor contract is justified. The determination shall
include a description of facts justifying such use and state whether the
authorized agency is planning to use a design-build contract or a construction
manager-general contractor contract;
(b) The criteria for making such determination, including the following
factors:
(i) The cost of the project;
(ii) The anticipated schedule for the project from preparation for
contracting through completion of construction;
(iii) The overall complexity of the project;
(iv) The need to overlap design and construction phases of the project; or
(v) An emergency exists that requires the use of an accelerated schedule
to make repairs; and
(c) An explanation of how using a design-build contract or construction
manager-general contractor contract will not result in favoritism or
substantially diminish competition in awarding such contract for such project.
Sec. 5. An authorized agency shall hire an architect licensed pursuant to
the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act or an engineer licensed pursuant to
the act to assist the authorized agency with the development of project
performance criteria and requests for proposals, with evaluation of proposals,
with evaluation of the construction to determine adherence to the project
performance criteria, and with any additional services requested by the
authorized agency to represent its interests in relation to a project. The
procedures used to hire such person or organization shall comply with the
Nebraska Consultants' Competitive Negotiation Act. The person or organization
hired shall be ineligible to be included as a provider of other services in a
proposal for the project for which he or she has been hired and shall not be
employed by or have a financial or other interest in a design-builder or
construction manager who will submit a proposal.
Sec. 6. The state building division shall adopt guidelines for entering
into a design-build contract or construction manager-general contractor
contract. The guidelines shall include the following:
(1) Preparation and content of requests for qualifications;
(2) Preparation and content of requests for proposals;
(3) Qualification and short-listing of design-builders and construction
managers. The guidelines shall provide that an authorized agency will evaluate
prospective design-builders and construction managers based on the information
submitted to the authorized agency in response to a request for qualifications
and will select a short list of design-builders or construction managers who
shall be considered qualified and eligible to respond to the request for
proposals;
(4) Preparation and submittal of proposals;
(5) Procedures and standards for evaluating proposals;
(6) Procedures for negotiations between the authorized agency and the
design-builders or construction managers submitting proposals prior to the
acceptance of a proposal if any such negotiations are contemplated; and
(7) Procedures for the evaluation of construction under a design-build
contract to determine adherence to the project performance criteria.
Sec. 7. The process for selecting a design-builder and entering into a
design-build contract shall be in accordance with sections 8 to 11 of this act.
Sec. 8. (1) An authorized agency shall prepare a request for
qualifications for design-build proposals and shall prequalify design-builders.
The request for qualifications shall describe the project in sufficient detail
to permit a design-builder to respond. The request for qualifications shall
identify the maximum number of design-builders the authorized agency will place
on a short list as qualified and eligible to receive a request for proposals.
(2) A person or organization hired by the authorized agency under section
5 of this act shall be ineligible to compete for a design-build contract on the
same project for which the person or organization was hired.
(3)(a) The request for qualifications shall be published:
(i) In a newspaper of statewide circulation once a week for three
consecutive weeks prior to the deadline for receiving requests for
-2-

LB660 LB660
2025 2025
qualifications; or
(ii) For twenty-one consecutive calendar days prior to the deadline for
receiving requests for qualifications on a website designated by the state
building division that is accessible to the public.
(b) The authorized agency may publish notice both in such a newspaper and
on such a website as described in this subsection.
(4) The authorized agency shall create a short list of qualified and
eligible design-builders in accordance with the guidelines adopted pursuant to
section 6 of this act. The authorized agency shall select at least two
prospective design-builders, except that if only one design-builder has
responded to the request for qualifications, the authorized agency may, in its
discretion, proceed or cancel the procurement. The request for proposals shall
be sent only to the design-builders placed on the short list.
Sec. 9. An authorized agency shall prepare a request for proposals for
each design-build contract. The request for proposals shall contain, at a
minimum, the following elements:
(1) The guidelines adopted by the state building division in accordance
with section 6 of this act. The identification of a publicly accessible
location of the guidelines, either physical or electronic, shall be considered
compliance with this subdivision;
(2) The proposed terms and conditions of the design-build contract,
including any terms and conditions which are subject to further negotiation;
(3) A project statement which contains information about the scope and
nature of the project;
(4) A statement regarding alternative technical concepts including the
process and time period in which such concepts may be submitted,
confidentiality of the concepts, and ownership of the rights to the
intellectual property contained in such concepts;
(5) Project performance criteria;
(6) Budget parameters for the project;
(7) Any bonding and insurance required by law or as may be additionally
required by the authorized agency;
(8) The criteria for evaluation of proposals and the relative weight of
each criterion. The criteria shall include, but are not limited to, the cost of
the work, construction experience, design experience, and the financial,
personnel, and equipment resources available for the project. The relative
weight to apply to any criterion shall be at the discretion of the authorized
agency based on each project, except that in all cases, the cost of the work
shall be given a relative weight of at least fifty percent;
(9) A requirement that the design-builder provide a written statement of
the design-builder's proposed approach to the design and construction of the
project, which may include graphic materials illustrating the proposed approach
to design and construction and shall include price proposals;
(10) A requirement that the design-builder agree to the following
conditions:
(a) At the time of the design-build proposal, the design-builder must
furnish to the authorized agency a written statement identifying the architect
or engineer who will perform the architectural or engineering work for the
project. The architect or engineer engaged by the design-builder to perform the
architectural or engineering work with respect to the project must have direct
supervision of such work and may not be removed by the design-builder prior to
the completion of the project without the written consent of the authorized
agency;
(b) At the time of the design-build proposal, the design-builder must
furnish to the authorized agency a written statement identifying the general
contractor who will provide the labor, material, supplies, equipment, and
construction services. The general contractor identified by the design-builder
may not be removed by the design-builder prior to completion of the project
without the written consent of the authorized agency;
(c) A design-builder offering design-build services with its own employees
who are design professionals licensed to practice in Nebraska must (i) comply
with the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act by procuring a certificate of
authorization to practice architecture or engineering and (ii) submit proof of
sufficient professional liability insurance in the amount required by the
authorized agency; and
(d) The rendering of architectural or engineering services by a licensed
architect or engineer employed by the design-builder must conform to the
Engineers and Architects Regulation Act; and
(11) Other information or requirements which the authorized agency, in its
discretion, chooses to include in the request for proposals.
Sec. 10. An authorized agency shall pay a stipend to qualified design-
builders that submit responsive proposals but are not selected. Payment of the
stipend shall give the authorized agency ownership of the intellectual property
contained in the proposals and alternative technical concepts. The amount of
the stipend shall be at the discretion of the authorized agency. The refusal to
pay or accept the stipend shall leave the intellectual property contained in
the proposals and alternative technical concepts in the possession of the
creator of the proposals and alternative technical concepts.
Sec. 11. (1) Design-builders shall submit proposals as required by the
request for proposals. An authorized agency may meet with individual design-
builders prior to the time of submitting the proposal and may have discussions
concerning alternative technical concepts. If an alternative technical concept
provides a solution that is equal to or considered a better value than the
-3-

LB660 LB660
2025 2025
requirements in the request for proposals and the alternative technical concept
is acceptable to the authorized agency, it may be incorporated as part of the
proposal by the design-builder. Notwithstanding any other provision of state
law to the contrary, alternative technical concepts shall be confidential and
not disclosed to other design-builders or members of the public from the time
the proposals are submitted until such proposals are opened by the authorized
agency.
(2) A proposal may be submitted in paper or electronic format. All
proposals shall be sealed and shall not be opened until expiration of the time
established for making the proposals as set forth in the request for proposals.
(3) Proposals may be withdrawn at any time prior to the opening of such
proposals in which case no stipend shall be paid. The authorized agency shall
have the right to reject any and all proposals at no cost to the authorized
agency other than any stipend for design-builders who have submitted responsive
proposals. The authorized agency may thereafter solicit new proposals using the
same or different project performance criteria or may cancel the design-build
solicitation.
(4) The authorized agency shall rank the design-builders in order of best
value pursuant to the criteria in the request for proposals. The authorized
agency may meet with design-builders prior to ranking.
(5) The authorized agency may attempt to negotiate a design-build contract
with the highest ranked design-builder selected by the authorized agency and
may enter into a design-build contract after negotiations. If the authorized
agency is unable to negotiate a satisfactory design-build contract with the
highest ranked design-builder, the authorized agency may terminate negotiations
with that design-builder. The authorized agency may then undertake negotiations
with the second highest ranked design-builder and may enter into a design-build
contract after negotiations. If the authorized agency is unable to negotiate a
satisfactory contract with the second highest ranked design-builder, the
authorized agency may undertake negotiations with the third highest ranked
design-builder, if any, and may enter into a design-build contract after
negotiations.
(6) If the authorized agency is unable to negotiate a satisfactory
contract with any of the ranked design-builders, the authorized agency may
either revise the request for proposals and solicit new proposals or cancel the
design-build process under the State Building Construction Alternatives Act.
Sec. 12. The process for selecting a construction manager and entering
into a construction manager-general contractor contract shall be in accordance
with sections 13 to 16 of this act.
Sec. 13. (1) An authorized agency shall prepare a request for
qualifications for construction manager-general contractor contract proposals
and shall prequalify construction managers. The request for qualifications
shall describe the project in sufficient detail to permit a construction
manager to respond. The request for qualifications shall identify the maximum
number of eligible construction managers the authorized agency will place on a
short list as qualified and eligible to receive a request for proposals.
(2)(a) The request for qualifications shall be published:
(i) In a newspaper of statewide circulation once a week for three
consecutive weeks prior to the deadline for receiving requests for
qualifications; or
(ii) For twenty-one consecutive calendar days prior to the deadline for
receiving requests for qualifications on a website designated by the authorized
agency that is accessible to the public.
(b) The authorized agency may publish notice both in such a newspaper and
on such a website as described in this subsection.
(3) The authorized agency shall create a short list of qualified and
eligible construction managers in accordance with the guidelines adopted
pursuant to section 6 of this act. The authorized agency shall select at least
two construction managers, except that if only one construction manager has
responded to the request for qualifications, the authorized agency may, in its
discretion, proceed or cancel the procurement. The request for proposals shall
be sent only to the construction managers placed on the short list.
Sec. 14. The authorized agency shall prepare a request for proposals for
each construction manager-general contractor contract. The request for
proposals shall contain, at a minimum, the following elements:
(1) The guidelines adopted by the state building division in accordance
with section 6 of this act. The identification of a publicly accessible
location of the guidelines, either physical or electronic, shall be considered
compliance with this subdivision;
(2) The proposed terms and conditions of the contract, including any terms
and conditions which are subject to further negotiation;
(3) Any bonding and insurance required by law or as may be additionally
required by the authorized agency;
(4) General information about the project which will assist the authorized
agency in its selection of the construction manager, including a project
statement which contains information about the scope and nature of the project,
the project site, the schedule, and the estimated budget;
(5) The criteria for evaluation of proposals and the relative weight of
each criterion;
(6) A statement that the construction manager shall not be allowed to
sublet, assign, or otherwise dispose of any portion of the contract without
consent of the authorized agency. In no case shall the authorized agency allow
the construction manager to sublet more than seventy percent of the work,
-4-

LB660 LB660
2025 2025
excluding specialty items; and
(7) Other information or requirements which the authorized agency, in its
discretion, chooses to include in the request for proposals.
Sec. 15. (1) Construction managers shall submit proposals as required by
the request for proposals.
(2) A proposal may be submitted in paper or electronic format. All
proposals shall be sealed and shall not be opened until expiration of the time
established for making the proposals as set forth in the request for proposals.
(3) Proposals may be withdrawn at any time prior to signing a contract for
preconstruction services. The authorized agency shall have the right to reject
any and all proposals at no cost to the authorized agency. The authorized
agency may thereafter solicit new proposals or may cancel the construction
manager-general contractor procurement process.
(4) The authorized agency shall rank the construction managers in
accordance with the qualification-based selection process and pursuant to the
criteria in the request for proposals. The authorized agency may meet with
construction managers prior to the ranking.
(5) The authorized agency may attempt to negotiate a contract for
preconstruction services with the highest ranked construction manager and may
enter into a contract for preconstruction services after negotiations. If the
authorized agency is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract for
preconstruction services with the highest ranked construction manager, the
authorized agency may terminate negotiations with that construction manager.
The authorized agency may then undertake negotiations with the second highest
ranked construction manager and may enter into a contract for preconstruction
services after negotiations. If the authorized agency is unable to negotiate a
satisfactory contract with the second highest ranked construction manager, the
authorized agency may undertake negotiations with the third highest ranked
construction manager, if any, and may enter into a contract for preconstruction
services after negotiations.
(6) If the authorized agency is unable to negotiate a satisfactory
contract for preconstruction services with any of the ranked construction
managers, the authorized agency may either revise the request for proposals and
solicit new proposals or cancel the construction manager-general contractor
contract process under the State Building Construction Alternatives Act.
Sec. 16. (1) Before the construction manager begins any construction
services, the authorized agency shall:
(a) Conduct an independent cost estimate for the project; and
(b) Conduct contract negotiations with the construction manager to develop
a construction manager-general contractor contract for construction services.
(2) If the construction manager and the authorized agency are unable to
negotiate a contract, the authorized agency may use other contract procurement
processes as provided by law. Persons or organizations who submitted proposals
but were unable to negotiate a contract with the authorized agency shall be
eligible to compete in the other contract procurement processes.
Sec. 17. A design-build contract and a construction manager-general
contractor contract may be conditioned upon later refinements in scope and
price and may permit an authorized agency in agreement with the design-builder
or construction manager to make changes in the project without invalidating the
contract.
Sec. 18. Nothing in the State Building Construction Alternatives Act
shall limit or reduce statutory or regulatory requirements regarding insurance.
Sec. 19. The state building division may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the State Building Construction Alternatives Act.
Sec. 20. Sections 20 to 24 of this act shall be known and may be cited as
the Secure Drone Purchasing Act.
Sec. 21. The Legislature finds that it is in the interest of Nebraska to
ensure its security against espionage, surveillance, and theft of intellectual
property by the People's Republic of China and other hostile actors. It is the
intent of the Legislature to limit the purchase of unmanned aircraft systems
known to present a security threat to the state, its businesses, and its
residents and to encourage the purchase of unmanned aircraft systems that are
deemed secure.
Sec. 22. For purposes of the Secure Drone Purchasing Act:
(1) Division means the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of
Transportation; and
(2) The terms unmanned aerial system and drone are synonymous as used in
the act and mean a powered, aerial vehicle that:
(a) Does not carry a human operator and is operated without the
possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft;
(b) Uses aerodynamic forces to provide vehicle lift;
(c) Can fly autonomously or be piloted remotely; and
(d) Can be expendable or recoverable.
Sec. 23. (1) Effective January 1, 2027, no state agency shall purchase or
acquire a drone or unmanned aerial system other than those cleared by the
division pursuant to section 24 of this act.
(2) To the extent practicable, political subdivisions shall purchase or
acquire only those drones and unmanned aerial systems cleared by the division
pursuant to section 24 of this act.
(3) Effective January 1, 2027, no state funds shall be used to purchase or
acquire a drone or unmanned aerial system whose purchase would be prohibited by
section 24 of this act.
(4) A contract or agreement for the purchase or acquisition of a drone or
-5-

LB660 LB660
2025 2025
unmanned aerial system in violation of this section is void and unenforceable.
(5) Any electric supplier supplying, producing, or distributing
electricity within the state for sale at retail is exempt from the Secure Drone
Purchasing Act if the electric supplier is in compliance with the critical
infrastructure protection requirements issued by the North American Electric
Reliability Corporation.
Sec. 24. (1) On or before January 1, 2026, the division, in consultation
with the Department of Administrative Services, the Committee on Pacific
Conflict, the Nebraska State Patrol, and the Law Enforcement Drone Association
or any other organization that creates and implements best practices and
standards of training for the use of drones in law enforcement, shall create
and regularly maintain a document known as the List of Secure Drones Authorized
for Purchase that contains names of devices and vendors of drones and unmanned
aerial systems that are:
(a) Cleared by the United States Department of Defense through its Blue
UAS Program;
(b) Determined to be compliant with the requirements of the National
Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2024, Public Law 118-31;
(c) Determined by the division to be designed, maintained, modified, or
operated in such a manner that they are incapable, under normal operating
conditions, of transmitting data to unauthorized persons or entities; or
(d) Otherwise determined to present no threat to the security of the State
of Nebraska as specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) For purposes of the Secure Drone Purchasing Act, drones are considered
to present no threat to the security of the State of Nebraska if the following
cybersecurity and data protection requirements are met:
(a) All video footage, images, and telemetry data collected, transmitted,
or stored by the drone is housed in the United States and managed in accordance
with federal and state privacy laws, cybersecurity standards, and guidelines
issued by the Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency and the Federal
Bureau of Investigation;
(b) The system enforces end-to-end encryption for data-at-rest and data-
in-transit using AES-256 encryption and transport layer security protocols to
prevent unauthorized access;
(c) The system operates on a secured, segmented network to mitigate
cybersecurity risks. Multifactor authentication and role-based access controls
are enforced for all drone platform access;
(d) The drone incorporates tamper-proof hardware to prevent unauthorized
modifications;
(e) The drone incorporates real-time monitoring systems capable of
detecting unauthorized access, cyber threats, or operational anomalies and
automated countermeasures; and
(f) State agencies, political subdivisions, and their contractors conduct
annual independent security audits and obtain certifications demonstrating
compliance with the National Institute of Standards and Technology
Cybersecurity Framework 2.0, ISO27001, and SOC 2.
(3) In creating and maintaining the List of Secure Drones Authorized for
Purchase, the division may consult with recognized cybersecurity experts from
the private and public sectors, the Nebraska State Patrol and other law
enforcement agencies, the Nebraska National Guard, the Nebraska Emergency
Management Agency, the office of the Chief Information Officer, or other
pertinent entities to ensure the integrity and security of all data collected
by unmanned aerial systems used in this state.
(4) The List of Secure Drones Authorized for Purchase shall be published
on the division's website and updated at least every six months. The division
may maintain the confidentiality of any information and documents related to
its assessment and decisionmaking process collected or created under the Secure
Drone Purchasing Act and withhold such information from public disclosure
pursuant to subdivision (5) of section 84-712.05.
(5) Those devices and vendors on the division's List of Secure Drones
Authorized for Purchase shall be preferred over others in state and local
procurement actions.
Sec. 25. (1) For purposes of this section, expenditures of federal funds
means expenditures by the state of any financial assistance that is received
from the United States Government or any agency thereof required to be
submitted to the budget request and reporting system of the Department of
Administrative Services, whether such assistance is received by contract, grant
subsidy, augmentation, or reimbursement or in any other form.
(2) All agencies of the state government for which the Legislature
appropriates funds shall submit a federal funding inventory to the office of
the Director of Administrative Services on or before September 15 of each even-
numbered year. The federal funding inventory shall include:
(a) The aggregate value of the expenditures of federal funds by the agency
for the preceding fiscal year;
(b) The aggregate amount of federal funds appropriated to the agency by
the Legislature for the preceding fiscal year;
(c) The percentage of the agency's total budget for the preceding fiscal
year that constitutes expenditures of federal funds by the agency for that
fiscal year;
(d) Any requirement for a state match and a copy of any agreement,
including a memorandum of understanding, a maintenance-of-effort agreement, or
a contract, entered into with any federal entity to receive federal funds for
the preceding fiscal year, with a cover sheet that details the obligations
-6-

LB660 LB660
2025 2025
imposed on the state agency, including any state monetary match requirements,
the number of full-time and part-time positions obligated by the agreement, and
a description of any other resources and obligations incurred by the state
agency, and the citation to the applicable federal law, regulation, or grant
provision;
(e) An operating plan in the event that federal funds are reduced by ten
percent or more from the preceding fiscal year;
(f) A detailed description of the actions or results that were promised by
the state agency in order to receive federal funds;
(g) The state or federal statutory objective that is being met by the
expenditures of federal funds; and
(h) A detailed list of federal funds that have a foreseeable or potential
end date, the date, and the schedule of expenditures of federal funds expected
until that date.
Sec. 26. Section 72-803, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
72-803 (1) The state and any department or agency thereof, subject to the
powers of the state building division of the Department of Administrative
Services, shall have general charge of the erection of new buildings which are
being erected for such department or agency, the repair and improvement of
buildings under the control of such department or agency, including fire
escapes, and the improvement of grounds under the control of such department or
agency.
(2) Buildings and other improvements costing more than one hundred fifty
thousand dollars shall be (a) constructed under the general charge of the
department or agency as provided in subsection (1) of this section and (b) let
by contract to the lowest responsible bidder after proper advertisement as set
forth in subsection (4) of this section. The Department of Administrative
Services shall adjust the dollar amounts in this subsection every four years
beginning January 1, 2026, to account for inflationary and market changes. The
department shall select a construction cost index or any other published index
relevant to operations and utilities costs and shall base the adjustments on
the percentage changes in such index.
(3) The successful bidder at the letting shall enter into a contract with
the department or agency, prepared as provided for by subsection (4) of this
section, and shall furnish a bond for the faithful performance of his or her
contract, except that a performance bond shall not be required for any project
which has a total cost of one hundred thousand dollars or less unless the
department or agency includes a bond requirement in the specifications for the
project.
(4) When contracts are to be let by the department or agency as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, advertisements shall be published in
accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the state
building division stating that sealed proposals will be received by the
department or agency at its office on the date therein stated for the
furnishing of materials, the construction of buildings, or the making of
repairs or improvements and that plans and specifications can be seen at the
office of the department or agency. All bids or proposals shall be accompanied
by a certified check or by a bid bond in a sum fixed by the department or
agency and payable thereto. All such contracts shall be awarded to the lowest
responsible bidder, but the right shall be reserved to reject any and all bids.
Whenever any material described in any contract can be obtained from any state
institution, the department or agency shall exclude it from such a contract.
Sec. 27. Section 73-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
73-101 Whenever the State of Nebraska, or any department or any agency
thereof, any county board, county clerk, county highway superintendent, the
mayor and city council or commissioner of any municipality, any entity created
pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act, or
the officers of any school district, township, or other governmental
subdivision, shall advertise for bids in pursuance of any statutes of the State
of Nebraska, on any road contract work or any public improvements work, or for
supplies, construction, repairs, and improvements, and in all other cases where
bids for supplies or work, of any character whatsoever, are received for the
various departments and agencies of the state, and other subdivisions and
agencies enumerated in this section, they shall fix not only the day upon which
such bids shall be returned, received, or opened, as provided by other
statutes, but shall also fix the hour at which such bids shall close, or be
received or opened, and they shall also provide that such bids shall be
immediately and simultaneously opened in the presence of the bidders, or
representatives of the bidders, when the hour is reached for the bids to close.
Such bids may be withheld from disclosure until an intent to award is issued.
If bids are being opened on more than one contract, the officials having in
charge the opening of such bids may, if they deem it advisable, award each
contract as the bids are opened. Sections 73-101 to 73-106 shall not apply to
the State Building Construction Alternatives Act, the State Park System
Construction Alternatives Act, or sections 39-2808 to 39-2823.
Sec. 28. Section 73-307, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
73-307 Sections 73-301 to 73-306 shall not apply to the Nebraska
Consultants' Competitive Negotiation Act, the State Building Construction
Alternatives Act, the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act, sections
39-2808 to 39-2823, or section 57-1503.
-7-

LB660 LB660
2025 2025
Sections 73-301 to 73-306 shall not be construed to apply to renewals of
contracts already approved pursuant to or not subject to such sections, to
amendments to such contracts, or to renewals of such amendments unless the
amendments would directly cause or result in the replacement by the private
entity of additional permanent state employees or positions greater than the
replacement caused by the original contract.
Sec. 29. Section 81-1108.15, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1108.15 (1) Except as provided in the Nebraska State Capitol
Preservation and Restoration Act, the division shall have the primary functions
and responsibilities of statewide facilities planning, facilities construction,
and facilities administration and shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
(2) Facilities planning shall include the following responsibilities and
duties:
(a) To maintain utilization records of all state-owned, state-occupied,
and vacant facilities;
(b) To coordinate comprehensive capital facilities planning;
(c) To define and review program statements based on space utilization
standards;
(d) To prepare or review planning and construction documents;
(e) To develop and maintain time-cost schedules for capital construction
projects;
(f) To assist the Governor and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst in the
preparation of the capital construction budget recommendations;
(g) To maintain a complete inventory of all state-owned, state-occupied,
and vacant sites and structures and to review the proposals for naming such
sites and structures;
(h) To determine space needs of all state agencies and establish space-
allocation standards; and
(i) To cause a state comprehensive capital facilities plan to be
developed; and .
(j) To carry out the State Building Construction Alternatives Act.
(3) Facilities construction shall include the following powers and duties:
(a) To maintain close contact with and conduct inspections of each project
so as to assure execution of time-cost schedules and efficient contract
performance if such project's total design and construction cost is equal to or
greater than the project cost set by subdivision (1)(a) of section 81-1108.43
as adjusted by subsection (2) of section 81-1108.43;
(b) To perform final acceptance inspections and evaluations; and
(c) To coordinate all change or modification orders and progress payment
orders.
(4) Facilities administration shall include the following powers and
duties:
(a) To serve as state leasing administrator or agent for all facilities to
be leased for use by the state and for all state-owned facilities to be rented
to state agencies or other parties subject to section 81-1108.22. The division
shall remit the proceeds from any rentals of state-owned facilities to the
State Treasurer for credit to the State Building Revolving Fund and the State
Building Renewal Assessment Fund;
(b) To provide all maintenance, repairs, custodial duties, security, and
administration for all buildings and grounds owned or leased by the State of
Nebraska except as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this section;
(c) To be responsible for adequate parking and the designation of parking
stalls or spaces, including access aisles, in offstreet parking facilities for
the exclusive use of handicapped or disabled or temporarily handicapped or
disabled persons pursuant to section 18-1737;
(d) To ensure that all state-owned, state-occupied, and vacant facilities
are maintained or utilized to their maximum capacity or to dispose of such
facilities through lease, sale, or demolition;
(e) To submit electronically a report an annual report to the
Appropriations Committee of the Legislature and the Committee on Building
Maintenance regarding the amount of property leased by the state and the
availability of state-owned property for the needs of state agencies, upon
request by the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature, the Committee on
Building Maintenance, or a member of the Legislature;
(f) To report monthly time-cost data on projects to the Governor and the
Clerk of the Legislature. The report submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature
shall be submitted electronically;
(f) (g) To administer the State Emergency Capital Construction Contingency
Fund;
(g) (h) To submit status reports to the Governor and the Legislative
Fiscal Analyst after each quarter of a construction project is completed
detailing change orders and expenditures to date. The report submitted to the
Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically. Such reports
shall be required on all projects costing an amount equal to or greater than
the amount set forth in subdivision (1)(a) of section 81-1108.43 as adjusted by
subsection (2) of section 81-1108.43 and on such other projects as may be
designated by the division; and
(h) (i) To submit a final report on each project to the Governor and the
Legislative Fiscal Analyst. The report submitted to the Legislative Fiscal
Analyst shall be submitted electronically. Such report shall include, but not
be limited to, a comparison of final costs and appropriations made for the
-8-

LB660 LB660
2025 2025
project, change orders, and modifications and whether the construction complied
with the related approved program statement. Such reports shall be required on
all projects costing an amount equal to or greater than the amount set forth in
subdivision (1)(a) of section 81-1108.43 as adjusted by subsection (2) of
section 81-1108.43 and on such other projects as may be designated by the
division.
(5) Subdivisions (4)(b), (c), and (d) of this section shall not apply to
(a) state-owned facilities to be rented to state agencies or other parties by
the University of Nebraska, the Nebraska state colleges, the Department of
Transportation, and the Board of Educational Lands and Funds, (b) buildings and
grounds owned or leased for use by the University of Nebraska, the Nebraska
state colleges, and the Board of Educational Lands and Funds, (c) buildings and
grounds owned, leased, or operated by the Department of Correctional Services,
(d) facilities to be leased for nonoffice use by the Department of
Transportation, (e) buildings or grounds owned or leased by the Game and Parks
Commission if the application of such subdivisions to the buildings or grounds
would result in ineligibility for or repayment of federal funding, (f)
buildings or grounds of the state park system, state recreation areas, state
historical parks, state wildlife management areas, or state recreational
trails, or (g) other buildings or grounds owned or leased by the State of
Nebraska which are specifically exempted by the division because the
application of such subdivisions would result in the ineligibility for federal
funding or would result in hardship on an agency, board, or commission due to
other exceptional or unusual circumstances, except that nothing in this
subdivision shall prohibit the assessment of building rental depreciation
charges to tenants of facilities owned by the state and under the direct
control and maintenance of the division.
(6) Security for all buildings and grounds owned or leased by the State of
Nebraska in Lincoln, Nebraska, except the buildings and grounds described in
subsection (5) of this section, shall be the responsibility of the Nebraska
State Patrol. The Nebraska State Patrol shall consult with the Governor, the
Chief Justice, the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, and the State
Capitol Administrator regarding security policy within the State Capitol and
capitol grounds.
(7) Each member of the Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of the
reports required by subdivisions (4)(g) and (h) (4)(f), (h), and (i) of this
section by making a request for them to the State Building Administrator. The
information on such reports shall be submitted to the division by the agency
responsible for the project.
Sec. 30. Section 81-1701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-1701 The purpose of the Nebraska Consultants' Competitive Negotiation
Act is to provide managerial control over competitive negotiations by the state
for acquisition of professional architectural, engineering, landscape
architecture, or land surveying services. The act does not apply to (1)
contracts under section 57-1503, (2) contracts under subsection (6) of section
39-1349, (3) contracts under sections 39-2808 to 39-2823 except as provided in
section 39-2810, or (4) contracts under the State Park System Construction
Alternatives Act except as provided in section 37-1719, or (5) contracts under
the State Building Construction Alternatives Act except as provided in section
5 of this act.
Sec. 31. Section 82-317, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
82-317 The Legislature recognizes the responsibility of the state to
foster culture and the arts and its interest in the viable development of its
artists. The Legislature declares it to be the policy of this state that a
portion of all appropriations made after January 1, 1979, for capital
expenditures be set aside for the acquisition of artworks to be used in public
buildings except as otherwise provided in section 82-319.
Sec. 32. Section 82-318, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
82-318 As used in sections 82-317 to 82-329, 85-106 to 85-106.03, and
85-304 to 85-304.03, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Appropriation means shall mean the amount of money set by the
Legislature in excess of one million five hundred thousand dollars for new
construction or in excess of five two hundred fifty thousand dollars for
remodeling for the particular project which is not limited by law, rule, or
regulation less the amount of money spent for planning, land acquisition, and
site work;
(2) Art means shall mean the conscious use of skill, taste, and creative
imagination in the production of aesthetic objects;
(3) Original construction means shall mean the erection of a new building
or facility and does not include remodeling if the cost is five two hundred
fifty thousand dollars or less or expansion of existing structures; and
(4)(a) (4) Public building means shall mean buildings and facilities used
by or open to the public as guests or business invitees and shall exclude
repair shops, garages, warehouses, and buildings of a similar nature.
(b) Public building excludes repair shops, garages, warehouses,
laboratories, and industrial, agricultural, mechanical, and other buildings of
a similar nature; and
(5) Waiver means an exemption approved by the construction project
committee pursuant to section 82-321.
Sec. 33. Section 82-319, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
-9-

LB660 LB660
2025 2025
to read:
82-319 (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) or (3) of this
section, all All boards, agencies, commissions, or departments of state
government shall , after January 1, 1979, spend at least one percent of any
appropriation for the original construction of any state building for the
acquisition of works of art.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if (a) a waiver is
approved pursuant to section 82-321 or (b) more than seventy-five percent of
the project cost represents improvements to mechanical systems.
(3) The expenditure per project for works of art shall not exceed three
hundred thousand dollars.
(4) The works of art may be:
(a) An an integral part of the structure; ,
(b) Attached attached to the structure; ,
(c) Detached detached within or outside of the structure; or ,
(d) Exhibited or may be exhibited by the board, agency, commission, or
department in other public facilities.
Sec. 34. Section 82-321, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
82-321 (1) A committee shall be established for each construction project
which comes under sections 82-317 to 82-329, 85-106 to 85-106.03, and 85-304 to
85-304.03. The committee shall consist of the architect, three members from the
board, agency, commission, or department for which the building is being
constructed, and three members of the Nebraska Arts Council or three members
chosen by the council. The committee shall consult with the Nebraska Arts
Council in carrying out the provisions of sections 82-317 to 82-329, 85-106 to
85-106.03, and 85-304 to 85-304.03.
(2) A board, agency, commission, or department of state government may
request approval of a waiver from the committee for a construction project. The
committee shall consider whether extraordinary circumstances exist such that
the installation of works of art would not be appropriate. If the committee
makes such a finding, the committee shall notify the requesting party of the
approval of the waiver of the requirements of section 82-319.
Sec. 35. Section 84-906.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-906.02 (1) In addition to seeking information by other methods and
before publication of a notice under section 84-907, an agency is encouraged to
and may solicit comments from the public on a subject matter of possible rule
or regulation making by causing notice to be published in a newspaper of
general circulation of the subject matter and indicating where, when, and how
persons may comment.
(2) When considering the proposal or adoption of a rule or regulation, an
agency shall:
(a) Allow any person to submit comments or written materials or other
documentation in support or opposition to such proposal or adoption;
(b) Allow for such submission to be accomplished electronically or by
mail; and
(c) Not require a person wishing to make such a submission to travel to
any particular location.
Sec. 36. Section 84-911, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-911 (1) The validity of any rule or regulation may be determined upon a
petition for a declaratory judgment thereon addressed to the district court of
Lancaster County if it appears that the rule or regulation or its threatened
application interferes with or impairs or threatens to interfere with or impair
the legal rights or privileges of the petitioner. The petition shall be filed
in the district court for any county in which venue is proper under subsection
(3) of this section. The agency shall be made a party to the proceeding. The
declaratory judgment may be rendered whether or not the petitioner has first
requested the agency to pass upon the validity of the rule or regulation in
question.
(2)(a) (2) The court shall declare the rule or regulation invalid if it
finds that it violates constitutional provisions, exceeds the statutory
authority of the agency, or was adopted without compliance with the statutory
procedures.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, statutory procedures shall not
include procedures provided under the Negotiated Rulemaking Act.
(3) Venue for filing a petition under this section shall be proper in any
of the following counties in Nebraska:
(a) The county where the petitioner resides;
(b) The county where the petitioner's principal place of business is
located;
(c) Lancaster County; or
(d) The county in which the agency has its headquarters.
(4) An agency shall not take any action to restrict venue in contravention
of this section.
Sec. 37. (1) Beginning January 1, 2026, each agency shall begin a review
of all existing and pending rules and regulations. Every rule or regulation
shall be reviewed every five years.
(2) Each agency head shall designate an individual who is responsible for
oversight of the review.
(3) Each agency shall submit electronically a detailed report of its
findings along with any supporting documentation to the Clerk of the
-10-

LB660 LB660
2025 2025
Legislature on or before June 30 of each year for reviews conducted in the
previous year. The report shall indicate whether:
(a) The rule or regulation is essential to the health, safety, or welfare
of the public;
(b) The costs of the rule or regulation outweigh the benefits;
(c) The agency has a process in place to measure the effectiveness of the
rule or regulation;
(d) A less restrictive alternative has been considered; and
(e) The rule or regulation was promulgated as the result of a (i) state
statutory requirement, (ii) federal mandate, or (iii) court decision.
(4) Upon receipt of the agency reports required by this section, the
Reference Committee of the Legislature shall reference each report to the
appropriate standing committee of the Legislature based on each committee's
jurisdictional oversight. The standing committee shall review the agency report
and submit a report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature by December
15 of such year. Each such committee report shall include recommendations for
legislation, if necessary, to clarify any rule or regulation or provide
recommendations for clarifications to any rule or regulation.
(5) Agency rulemaking and regulationmaking authorized by the
Administrative Procedure Act shall be suspended during the pendency of the
agency review process mandated by this section with the exception of any
proposed rule or regulation that:
(a) Affects the health, safety, or welfare of the public;
(b) Is time sensitive; or
(c) Is subject to state or federal statutory deadlines.
Sec. 38. Section 84-920, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-920 Sections 84-901 to 84-920 and section 37 of this act, the
Occupational Board Reform Act, and the Personal Privacy Protection Act shall be
known and may be cited as the Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 39. Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16,
17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 37, 38,
and 41 of this act become operative three calendar months after the adjournment
of this legislative session. The other sections of this act become operative on
their effective date.
Sec. 40. Original sections 84-906.02 and 84-911, Reissue Revised Statutes
of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 41. Original sections 72-803, 73-307, 81-1108.15, 81-1701, 82-317,
82-318, 82-319, 82-321, and 84-920, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and
section 73-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 42. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-11-